Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 238.
SECTION 2. (1) If a member  who is a police officer or a firefighter requests a contested
case hearing to dispute a final denial of an application for a disability retirement  allowance
under ORS 238.320, the Public Employees Retirement Board shall ensure that  the contested
case is referred for a hearing no later than  180 days after the member requests the hearing,
or, if the member requests an extension, no later than 360 days after the member requests
the hearing.
(2) If the case is not referred  for a hearing within the time provided in this section, the
member prevails in disputing the final denial of the application under ORS 238.320.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 238A.
SECTION 4. (1) If a member who is a police officer or  a firefighter requests a contested
case hearing to dispute  a final denial of an application for disability benefits under ORS
238A.235, the Public Employees Retirement Board shall ensure that the  contested case is
referred for a hearing no  later than 180 days after the member requests the hearing, or, if
the member requests an extension, no later than 360 days after the member requests the
hearing.
(2) If the case is not referred  for a hearing within the time provided in this section, the
member prevails in disputing the final denial of the application under ORS 238A.235.
SECTION 5.
Within 360  days after the effective date of this 2025 Act, the Public Em-
ployees Retirement  Board shall refer for a hearing all contested cases for which a police of-
ficer or firefighter has requested a hearing before the effective date  of this 2025 Act to
dispute a final denial of an application for a disability  retirement allowance under ORS
238.320 or for disability benefits under ORS 238A.235.
SECTION 6.  ORS 238.320 is amended to read:
238.320. [ (1) Whenever an employee who is a member of the Public Employees Retirement System
is found, after being examined by one or more physicians selected  by the Public Employees Retirement
Board, to be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration, as  determined by medical
examination, and thereby unable to perform any work for which  qualified, by injury or disease sus-
Enrolled Senate Bill 588 (SB 588-A) Page 1
tained while in actual performance of  duty and not intentionally self-inflicted, the member shall receive
a disability retirement allowance consisting of: ]
(1)(a)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of  this paragraph, an employee who is
a member of the  Public Employees Retirement System is considered to be disabled if the
employee is found, after being examined by one or more physicians selected by the  Public
Employees Retirement Board, to be mentally or  physically incapacitated for an extended
duration, as determined by medical examination, and thereby unable to perform any work
for which qualified, by injury or disease sustained while in actual performance of duty and
not intentionally self-inflicted.
(B) An employee who is a  member of the Public Employees Retirement System and who
is employed as  a police officer or firefighter is considered to be disabled if the employee is
found, after being examined by one  or more physicians selected by the Public Employees
Retirement Board, to be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration,  as
determined by medical examination, and  thereby unable to perform the work the member
performed at  the time the member became disabled, by injury or disease sustained while in
actual performance of duty and not intentionally self-inflicted.
(b) When a member is found to be disabled under this subsection, the member shall  re-
ceive a disability retirement allowance consisting of:
[(a)] (A) A disability retirement refund annuity  based on the contributions under this chapter,
if any, credited to the member account of the member.
[(b)] (B) A  current service pension provided by the contributions of employers and, for benefits
that accrue on or after July 1, 2020, amounts in the employee pension stability  account established
for the member under ORS 238A.353, equal to:
[(A)] (i) For a police officer or firefighter, the pension to which the  member would have been
entitled if the member had worked continuously until attaining the age of 55, or  if the member has
attained the age of  55, the pension which the member would receive were the member to retire for
service, as provided in this chapter.
[(B)] (ii) For a member other than a police officer or firefighter, the pension to which  the
member would have been entitled if the member  had worked continuously until attaining the age
of 58, or if the member has attained the age of 58, the pension which the member would receive were
the member to retire for service, as provided in this chapter.
[(c)] (C) The same prior service  pension the member would have received had the member
worked until normal retirement age.
(2) As used in  subsection (1) of this section, “injury” means bodily injury causing the disability
directly and independently of all other causes and effected solely through accidental means.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, whenever an employee who is
a member of the system and who has  been an employee for 10 years or more of an employer par-
ticipating in the system is found, after being examined by one or more physicians  selected by the
board, to be mentally  or physically incapacitated for an extended duration, as determined by medical
examination, and thereby unable to  perform any work for which qualified, from cause other than
injury or disease sustained while in actual performance of duty or intentionally self-inflicted,  the
member shall receive a disability retirement allowance as provided in subsection (1)  of this section.
(b) Whenever an employee  who is a member of the system, who is employed as a police
officer or firefighter and who has been an  employee for 10 years or more of an employer
participating in the system is found,  after being examined by one or more physicians selected
by the board, to be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration, as  deter-
mined by medical examination, and thereby unable to  perform the work the member per-
formed at the  time the member became disabled, from cause other than injury or disease
sustained while in actual performance of duty or  intentionally self-inflicted, the member
shall receive a disability retirement allowance as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 588 (SB 588-A) Page 2
(4) Payments under  a disability retirement allowance provided for in subsection (1) or (3) of this
section for the first 90-day period of incapacity  shall be withheld until such 90-day period has
elapsed.
(5) An inactive member is not eligible for disability benefits referred  to in subsection (1) or (3)
of this section unless the member applies for such disability  benefits within five calendar years after
the date of separation from service with a participating public employer if the disability  is contin-
uous from such separation date or within six months after the date of such separation from  service
if disability occurs after such separation date.
(6) In computing years  of employment for the purpose of subsection (3) of this section, the fol-
lowing schedule shall be used: For employment before the employee established membership in the
Public Employees Retirement System,  a member shall be considered to have been employed for one
year for each year  of prior service credit allowed, and for any minor fraction of a year of continuous
service as certified by the employer for which no prior service credit was  granted. After having
established membership in the Public Employees Retirement System a member  shall be considered
to have been employed one year for each 12-month period or major fraction thereof during which
time the member received compensation for employment which entitled the member to  membership
in the system, as evidenced by payroll records.  For the purpose of determining a member’s eligibility
for disability benefits, no leave of absence after a member ceases to work for any participating em-
ployer shall be considered  other than accumulated sick leave not in excess of 90 days. The effective
date of the disability shall not in any event be determined by the board as prior to  the last day for
which the disabled member performed services for  a participating employer. No benefits may be paid
for any month in which the  member received salary or sick leave benefits from the participating
employer.
(7) For the purposes of subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a member  of the system shall be
considered to be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration  if the mental or
physical incapacity can be expected to result in death or has lasted or can  be expected to last for
a continuous period of not less than 90 days.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 238.340 is amended to read:
238.340. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when a  member retired be-
cause of disability is determined by the Public  Employees Retirement Board to be not incapacitated
to the extent  that the member is disabled from the performance of any work for which the member
is qualified, the disability retirement shall be canceled forthwith, the member shall be eligible for
reemployment and the member account of the member shall be credited with the  amount that stood
to the credit in the  member account of the member in the fund at the time of retirement for disa-
bility. Any such person who for any reason is not reinstated in  the service of an employer partic-
ipating in  the system shall receive separation benefits or service retirement benefits as provided in
this chapter.
(2) When a member retired because of disability who was employed as a police  officer or
firefighter at the time the member became disabled is  determined by the Public Employees
Retirement Board to be not incapacitated to the  extent that the member is disabled from the
performance of the work the member performed at the time the member became  disabled,
the disability retirement shall be canceled  forthwith, the member shall be eligible for reem-
ployment and the member account of the member shall be credited with the amount that
stood to the credit in the member account of the member in  the fund at the time of retire-
ment for disability. Any such person  who for any reason is not reinstated in the service of
an employer participating in the system shall receive separation benefits or  service retire-
ment benefits as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 238A.235 is amended to read:
238A.235. (1) An  active member of the pension program described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion who becomes  disabled shall receive a disability benefit in the amount of 45 percent of the salary
of the member determined as of the last full month of employment before the disability commences.
(2) The provisions of this section apply only to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 588 (SB 588-A) Page 3
(a) A member, other than a school employee as defined by ORS  238A.140, who has accrued 10
years or more of retirement credit before the member becomes disabled;
(b) A member who is a school employee as defined by ORS 238A.140 and who  was an active
member in 10 or more calendar years before the member becomes disabled; or
(c) A member who becomes disabled by reason of injury or disease sustained while in the  actual
performance of duty.
(3) A disability benefit under this section shall be paid until:
(a) The member is no longer disabled;
(b) The member returns to employment with any employer, including self-employment;
(c) The member receives earned income in any  month in an irregular or unpredictable
manner that exceeds 10  percent of the monthly salary of the member determined as of the
last full month of employment before the disability commences;
[(b)] (d) The member attains normal retirement age under ORS 238A.160; or
[(c)] (e) The member retires on or after the earliest normal retirement date for the  member un-
der ORS 238A.165.
(4)(a) Except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a member is considered to be
disabled for the purpose of this section if the member is found, after being examined by one or  more
physicians selected by the board, to be mentally or physically incapacitated for an extended duration
and unable to perform any work for which qualified,  by reason of injury or disease that was not
intentionally self-inflicted.
(b) A member who is employed as a  police officer or firefighter is considered to be disa-
bled for the  purpose of this section if the member is found, after being examined by one or
more physicians selected by the board, to be mentally or  physically incapacitated for an ex-
tended duration and unable to perform  the work the member performed at the time the
member became disabled, by reason of injury or disease that was not  intentionally self-
inflicted.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 238A.155 is amended to read:
238A.155. (1) Notwithstanding any other  provision of ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250, an active
member of the pension program  who becomes disabled shall accrue retirement credit and hours of
service credit for vesting purposes for the period during which the member is disabled.
(2) Retirement credit accrues  under this section only for as long as the member remains disabled
or until the member reaches the normal retirement age under ORS 238A.160.
(3) If a disabled member  does not return to employment with a participating public employer
after the period of disability, the member shall  receive a pension under ORS 238A.180, 238A.185 or
238A.190 upon retirement based on an adjusted salary. The adjusted salary shall be the salary  paid
to the disabled member on the date the member left active employment with  the participating public
employer by reason of  disability, adjusted for each year after the member left employment and be-
fore the member’s effective date of retirement  to reflect cost-of-living changes, based on the Con-
sumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region  (All Items), as published by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. Adjustments under  this subsection
may not exceed a two percent  increase or decrease for any year. An adjustment shall be made under
this subsection only for calendar years in which the member is disabled for  at least six months
during the year.
(4) Retirement credit for the period of  disability under this section shall be classified the same
as the member’s last qualifying position prior to the disability.
(5) A pension program member is considered to be disabled for the purpose of this section if:
(a)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,  the member is  found, after
being examined by one  or more physicians selected by the Public Employees Retirement Board, to
be mentally or physically incapacitated  for an extended duration and unable to perform any work
for which qualified, by reason of injury or disease that was not intentionally self-inflicted; or
(B) If the member was employed as a police officer or firefighter at  the time the member
became disabled, the member is found, after  being examined by one or more physicians se-
Enrolled Senate Bill 588 (SB 588-A) Page 4
lected by the board, to be mentally or physically incapacitated for  an extended duration and
unable to perform the work the member performed  at the time the member became disabled,
by reason of injury or disease that was not intentionally self-inflicted; or
(b) The member receives workers’ compensation benefits by reason of injury or disease that  was
sustained while in actual performance of duty with a participating public  employer and that was not
intentionally self-inflicted and returns to employment with a participating public employer  after the
period of disability.
SECTION 10.  ORS 238.325 is amended to read:
238.325. (1) At any time after establishing membership, but before  the expiration of 90 days after
the Public Employees  Retirement Board makes its finding that the employee is disabled, an employee
who is a member of the Public Employees Retirement System may elect to  convert the disability
retirement allowance otherwise payable on the member account  of the member into a disability re-
tirement annuity of equivalent actuarial value, by selecting one of the optional forms named  below.
The election of Option 2, 2A, 3 or 3A shall be effective immediately upon the effective date of  the
member’s disability, and in the event of death  within the first 90-day period of incapacity, payment
to the beneficiary of the member shall be made in accordance with the option selected.
Option 1. (a) A life annuity (nonrefund) payable during the member’s life only, which shall  be
the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated contributions under this chapter and interest  thereon
credited to the member at the time the member retires (if death occurs  before the first payment is
due, the member account of  the member shall be treated as though death had occurred before re-
tirement); (b) a life pension (nonrefund) provided by the contributions  of employers and, for benefits
that accrue on  or after July 1, 2020, amounts in the employee pension stability account established
for the member under ORS 238A.353  as provided in ORS 238.320 [ (1)(b)] (1)(b)(B) ; (c) an additional
nonrefund pension for prior service credit,  including military service, credited to the member at the
time the member first becomes a  member of the system, as elsewhere provided in this chapter, which
pension shall be provided by the contributions of the employer; or
Option 2. A reduced disability retirement allowance payable during  the period of incapacity,
with the provision that after death, if  death shall occur after the effective date of the disability and
during the period of  incapacity, it shall continue for the life of the beneficiary whom the member
has designated in writing duly acknowledged and filed with the board at the time  of election, should
the beneficiary survive the member; or
Option 2A. A reduced disability  retirement allowance payable during the period of incapacity
which, unless modified under subsection (3) of  this section, continues after death, if death shall oc-
cur after the effective date of the disability and during the period of incapacity, for the life  of the
beneficiary whom the  member nominates by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with
the board at the time of election, should the beneficiary survive the member; or
Option 3. A reduced disability retirement allowance payable during  the period of incapacity,
with the provision that after death, if  death shall occur after the effective date of the disability and
during the period of incapacity, such allowance shall continue at one-half the  rate paid to the
member and be paid for the life of the  beneficiary whom the member has designated in writing duly
acknowledged and filed with  the board at the time of election, should the beneficiary survive the
member; or
Option 3A. A reduced disability retirement allowance payable during  the period of incapacity
which, unless modified under subsection (3) of this section, continues  after death, if death shall oc-
cur after the effective date  of the disability and during the period of incapacity, at one-half the rate
paid to the member and is paid for the life of the beneficiary whom the member nominates by writ-
ten designation duly acknowledged and filed with the board at the time of election, should the ben-
eficiary survive the member; or
Option 4. A reduced disability  retirement allowance payable during the period of incapacity,
with the provisions that if the member dies during the period of incapacity and before a total of 180
monthly payments is made, the remainder  of the 180 monthly payments shall be paid monthly to the
beneficiary the member nominates by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the
Enrolled Senate Bill 588 (SB 588-A) Page 5
board at any time before the member’s death; and that if the member  designates no beneficiary to
receive the monthly payments or no such beneficiary is able to receive the  monthly payments, an
amount equal to the actuarial value, on the date of the member’s death, of the total of  the monthly
payments not  made to the member shall be paid according to ORS 238.390 for disposal of an amount
credited to the member  account of a member at the time of death; and that if the beneficiary re-
ceiving monthly payments dies before the  total number of monthly payments to which the benefici-
ary is entitled is made, an amount  equal to the actuarial value, on the date of the beneficiary’s
death, of the total of the monthly payments not made to the member and beneficiary shall be paid
according to ORS 238.390 for disposal of an amount credited to the member account  of a member
at the time of death and as if the beneficiary had been a member.
(2) The beneficiary designated  by a member to receive any benefit under this section shall be
the same as designated under ORS 238.390 (1). The designation of a beneficiary  or the election of
an option may  be changed by a member within 60 days after the date of the first benefit payment,
except that the designation of a beneficiary  under Option 4 may be changed by the member at any
time before the member’s death.
(3) If a retired member has elected to receive  a disability retirement allowance under Option
2A or Option 3A as provided in subsection (1) of  this section, and if the beneficiary under that op-
tion dies after the expiration of the time within which the member could  change the election of an
option or if the beneficiary  is the spouse of the member and the marriage relationship is terminated
as provided by law after  the expiration of the time within which the member could change the
election of an option, the member may elect to receive, in  lieu of the optional form of allowance
previously elected, the allowance that the member would  have received on the effective date of re-
tirement under Option 1 as provided in subsection (1) of this section and  adjusted by the actual
amount of any cost-of-living or other post-retirement adjustments  made to the original allowance
since the effective date of retirement. Notice of election under this  subsection must be in a form
approved by the board. If an election is made under this subsection, the  Option 1 payment amount
is applicable to the first full month after the death of the beneficiary, or the first full  month after
entry of the judgment of divorce, and payable the  first day of the month thereafter. If the increased
amount is not paid in any month in which the increased amount is due,  the board shall make a lump
sum payment to the retired member  that is equal to the difference between the amount paid to the
member for that month and the amount that should  have been paid under the provisions of this
subsection.
(4) The cost to the system of a disability retirement allowance  in any optional form may not
exceed the cost to the system of a nonrefund disability  retirement allowance payable to, and on
account of, the member making such election.
(5) The obligation for payment of any benefit in force prior to April  8, 1953, may not be altered
by subsections (1) to (4) of  this section. However, the beneficiary of a retired member who prior to
July 1, 1953, elected  an option but died prior to the effective date of such election, shall have a right
to repay, before December 31, 1953, the  amount of the lump sum refund made in lieu of the monthly
life benefit elected and receive payment of such benefit, computed as of the date of the member’s
death and payable from such date.
(6) If a member who  would have qualified for disability benefits makes preliminary application
for such benefits but dies prior to being found  by the board to be disabled or prior to electing a plan
of benefit payments, and the records of the board indicate that the member had designated the sur-
viving spouse as beneficiary under ORS 238.390 (1), such surviving spouse may, not more  than 90
days after the board makes its finding that the member would have  qualified for disability benefits
if living:
(a) Elect  to receive the amount referred to in ORS 238.395 if such benefit would have been
available if the member had not applied for disability benefits;
(b) If not eligible for benefits under  ORS 238.395, elect to receive benefits under ORS 238.390 (1);
or
Enrolled Senate Bill 588 (SB 588-A) Page 6
(c) Elect  Option 2 or 3 under subsection (1) of this section and designate the surviving spouse
as beneficiary thereunder with the same force and effect as if the election and designation had been
properly made by the deceased member.
(7) The board may deny an election  to convert a disability retirement allowance under this
section, a change of beneficiary under this section  or a change in benefit options under this section
if that denial is required to maintain the status of the  system and the Public Employees Retirement
Fund as a qualified governmental  retirement plan and trust under the Internal Revenue Code and
under regulations adopted pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 11.
Sections 2 and 4 of this 2025 Act apply to requests  for contested case
hearings made on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 12. The amendments to ORS  238.320, 238.325, 238.340, 238A.155 and 238A.235 by
sections 6 to 10 of this 2025  Act apply to open applications for disability benefits or contin-
uation of disability benefits that have  not been referred for a contested case hearing before
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 13. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 588 (SB 588-A) Page 7